Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB326.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2506 of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is repealed:[§ 2506. Drug delivery resulting in death.(a) Offense defined.--A person commits a felony of the first degree if the person intentionally administers, dispenses, delivers, gives, prescribes, sells or distributes any controlled substance or counterfeit controlled substance in violation of 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 section 13(a)(14) or (30) of the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act, and another person dies as a result of using the substance.(b) Penalty.--(1) A person convicted under subsection (a) shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment which shall be fixed by the court at not more than 40 years.(2) Paragraph (1) shall not apply to a person convicted under section 2502(c) (relating to murder) when the victim is less than 13 years of age and the conduct arises out of the same criminal act.(f) Forfeiture.--Assets against which a forfeiture petition has been filed and is pending or against which the Commonwealth has indicated an intention to file a forfeiture petition shall not be subject to a fine. Nothing in this section shall prevent a fine from being imposed on assets which have been subject to an unsuccessful forfeiture petition.]Section 2. Title 18 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 2720. Drug delivery resulting in death or serious bodily injury.(a) Offense defined.--A person commits an offense if the person unlawfully and intentionally administers, dispenses, delivers, gives, prescribes, sells or distributes a controlled substance or counterfeit controlled substance and another person dies or suffers serious bodily injury as a result of using the substance, alone or in combination with any other substance.(b) Penalty.--(1) Except as provided under paragraph (2), the following apply:20250HB0326PN0246 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) If the offense resulted in the death of the victim, the offense constitutes a felony of the first degree and the person shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment which shall be fixed by the court at not more than 40 years.(ii) If the offense resulted in serious bodily injury to the victim, the offense constitutes a felony of the third degree.(2) Paragraph (1)(i) shall not apply to a person convicted under section 2502(c) (relating to murder) when the victim is less than 13 years of age and the conduct arises out of the same criminal act.(c) Affirmative defense.--It shall be an affirmative defense under this section that the person was not given or did not receive any service or anything of value in exchange for the delivery of the substance.(d) Forfeiture.--Assets against which a forfeiture petition has been filed and is pending or against which the Commonwealth has indicated an intention to file a forfeiture petition shall not be subject to a fine. Nothing in this section shall prevent a fine from being imposed on assets which have been subject to an unsuccessful forfeiture petition.(e) Definition.--As used in this section, the term "unlawfully" means conduct which constitutes a violation of section 13(a)(14) or (30) of the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act, but without regard for whether the conduct took place in this Commonwealth.Section 3. Section 3308(a) of Title 18 is amended to read:§ 3308. Additional fine for arson committed for profit.20250HB0326PN0246 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) General rule.--Any person convicted under section [2506 (relating to arson murder) or] 3301 (relating to arson and related offenses) where any consideration was paid or payable, in addition to any sentence of imprisonment, shall be fined an amount double the amount of the consideration or the maximum lawful fine as provided in section 1101 (relating to fines), whichever is greater.* * *Section 4. The definition of "crime of violence" in section 5702 of Title 18 is amended to read:§ 5702. Definitions.As used in this chapter, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Crime of violence." Any of the following:(1) Any of the following crimes:(i) Murder in any degree as defined in section 2502(a), (b) or (c) (relating to murder).(ii) Voluntary manslaughter as defined in section 2503 (relating to voluntary manslaughter), drug delivery resulting in death or serious bodily injury as defined in section [2506(a) relating] 2720 (relating to drug delivery resulting in death or serious bodily injury), aggravated assault as defined in section 2702(a)(1) or (2) (relating to aggravated assault), 2718 (relating to strangulation), kidnapping as defined in section 2901(a) or (a.1) (relating to kidnapping), rape as defined in section 3121(a), (c) or (d) (relating to rape), involuntary deviate sexual intercourse as defined in 20250HB0326PN0246 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 section 3123(a), (b) or (c) (relating to involuntary deviate sexual intercourse), sexual assault as defined in section 3124.1 (relating to sexual assault), aggravated indecent assault as defined in section 3125(a) or (b) (relating to aggravated indecent assault), incest as defined in section 4302(a) or (b) (relating to incest), arson as defined in section 3301(a) (relating to arson and related offenses), burglary as defined in section 3502(a)(1) (relating to burglary), robbery as defined in section 3701(a)(1)(i), (ii) or (iii) (relating to robbery) or robbery of a motor vehicle as defined in section 3702(a) (relating to robbery of motor vehicle).(iii) Intimidation of witness or victim as defined in section 4952(a) and (b) (relating to intimidation of witnesses or victims).(iv) Retaliation against witness, victim or party as defined in section 4953(a) and (b) (relating to retaliation against witness, victim or party).(v) Criminal attempt as defined in section 901(a) (relating to criminal attempt), criminal solicitation as defined in section 902(a) (relating to criminal solicitation) or criminal conspiracy as defined in section 903(a) (relating to criminal conspiracy) to commit any of the offenses specified in this definition.(2) Any offense equivalent to an offense under paragraph (1) under the laws of this Commonwealth in effect at the time of the commission of that offense or under the laws of another jurisdiction.* * *Section 5. Section 5551 of Title 42 is amended by adding a 20250HB0326PN0246 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 paragraph to read:§ 5551. No limitation applicable.A prosecution for the following offenses may be commenced at any time:* * *(8) A violation of 18 Pa.C.S. § 2720 (relating to drug delivery resulting in death or serious bodily injury) if the offense resulted in the death of the victim.Section 6. Sections 5552(b) and 9714(g) of Title 42 are amended to read:§ 5552. Other offenses.* * *(b) Major offenses.--A prosecution for any of the following offenses must be commenced within five years after it is committed:(1) Under the following provisions of Title 18 (relating to crimes and offenses):Section 901 (relating to criminal attempt) involving attempt to commit murder where no murder occurs.Section 902 (relating to criminal solicitation) involving solicitation to commit murder where no murder occurs.Section 903 (relating to criminal conspiracy) involving conspiracy to commit murder where no murder occurs.Section 911 (relating to corrupt organizations).Section 2702 (relating to aggravated assault).Section 2706 (relating to terroristic threats).Section 2713 (relating to neglect of care-dependent person).20250HB0326PN0246 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 2720 (relating to drug delivery resulting in death or serious bodily injury) if the offense resulted in serious bodily injury to the victim.Section 2901 (relating to kidnapping).Section 3301 (relating to arson and related offenses).Section 3502 (relating to burglary).Section 3701 (relating to robbery).Section 3921 (relating to theft by unlawful taking or disposition) through former section 3933 (relating to unlawful use of computer).Section 4101 (relating to forgery).Section 4107 (relating to deceptive or fraudulent business practices).Section 4108 (relating to commercial bribery and breach of duty to act disinterestedly).Section 4109 (relating to rigging publicly exhibited contest).Section 4117 (relating to insurance fraud).Section 4701 (relating to bribery in official and political matters) through section 4703 (relating to retaliation for past official action).Section 4902 (relating to perjury) through section 4912 (relating to impersonating a public servant).Section 4952 (relating to intimidation of witnesses or victims).Section 4953 (relating to retaliation against witness, victim or party).Section 5101 (relating to obstructing administration of law or other governmental function).20250HB0326PN0246 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 5111 (relating to dealing in proceeds of unlawful activities).Section 5512 (relating to lotteries, etc.) through section 5514 (relating to pool selling and bookmaking).Section 5902(b) (relating to prostitution and related offenses).Section 6111(g)(2) and (4) (relating to sale or transfer of firearms).(2) Any offense punishable under section 13(f) of the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act.(3) Any conspiracy to commit any of the offenses set forth in paragraphs (1) and (2) and any solicitation to commit any of the offenses in paragraphs (1) and (2) if the solicitation results in the completed offense.(4) Under the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the [Public Welfare] Human Services Code.(5) Under the former act of November 24, 1998 (P.L.874, No.110), known as the Motor Vehicle Chop Shop and Illegally Obtained and Altered Property Act.* * *§ 9714. Sentences for second and subsequent offenses.* * *(g) Definition.--As used in this section, the term "crime of violence" means murder of the third degree, voluntary manslaughter, manslaughter of a law enforcement officer as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 2507(c) or (d) (relating to criminal homicide of law enforcement officer), murder of the third degree involving an unborn child as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 2604(c) (relating to murder of unborn child), aggravated assault of an 20250HB0326PN0246 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 unborn child as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 2606 (relating to aggravated assault of unborn child), aggravated assault as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 2702(a)(1) or (2) (relating to aggravated assault), assault of law enforcement officer as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 2702.1(a)(1) (relating to assault of law enforcement officer), use of weapons of mass destruction as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 2716(b) (relating to weapons of mass destruction), terrorism as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 2717(b)(2) (relating to terrorism), strangulation when the offense is graded as a felony as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 2718 (relating to strangulation), trafficking of persons when the offense is graded as a felony of the first degree as provided in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3011 (relating to trafficking in individuals), rape, involuntary deviate sexual intercourse, aggravated indecent assault, incest, sexual assault, arson endangering persons or aggravated arson as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3301(a) or (a.1) (relating to arson and related offenses), ecoterrorism as classified in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3311(b)(3) (relating to ecoterrorism), kidnapping, burglary as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3502(a)(1) (relating to burglary), robbery as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3701(a)(1)(i), (ii) or (iii) (relating to robbery), or robbery of a motor vehicle, drug delivery resulting in death or serious bodily injury as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § [2506(a)] 2720 (relating to drug delivery resulting in death or serious bodily injury), or criminal attempt, criminal conspiracy or criminal solicitation to commit murder or any of the offenses listed above, or an equivalent crime under the laws of this Commonwealth in effect at the time of the commission of that offense or an equivalent crime in another jurisdiction.Section 7. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0326PN0246 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930